Illinois, session 104th, HB663.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sanitary District Act of 1936 is amended by 5changing Section 33 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 2805/33)  (from Ch. 42, par. 444)7    Sec. 33. Except as provided in Section 33.1, any sanitary 8district created under this Act which does not have 9outstanding and unpaid any revenue bonds issued under the 10provisions of this Act may be dissolved as follows:11    (a) Any 50 electors residing within the area of any 12sanitary district may file with the circuit clerk of the 13county in which the area is situated, a petition addressed to 14the circuit court to cause submission of the question whether 15the sanitary district shall be dissolved. Upon the filing of 16the petition with the clerk, the court shall certify the 17question to the proper election officials who shall submit the 18question at an election in accordance with the general 19election law, and give notice of the election in the manner 20provided by the general election law.21    The question shall be in substantially the following form:22- 23    "Shall the sanitary                 YES HB0663 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 04550 RTM 14577 b1district of .... be              ---------------------------- 2dissolved?"                             NO 3-------------------------------------------------------------4    If a majority of the votes cast on this question are in 5favor of dissolution of the sanitary district, then such 6organization shall cease, and the sanitary district is 7dissolved, and the court shall direct the sanitary district to 8discharge all outstanding obligations.9    (b) The County of Lake may dissolve the Fox Lake Hills 10Sanitary District, thereby acquiring all of the District's 11assets and responsibilities, upon adopting a resolution 12stating: (1) the reasons for dissolving the District; (2) that 13there are no outstanding debts of the District or that the 14County has sufficient funds on hand or available to satisfy 15such debts; (3) that no federal or State permit or grant will 16be impaired by dissolution of the District; and (4) that the 17County assumes all assets and responsibilities of the 18District. Upon dissolution of the District, the statutory 19powers of the former District shall be exercised by the county 20board of the Lake County. Within 60 days after the effective 21date of such resolution, the County of Lake shall notify the 22Illinois Environmental Protection Agency regarding the 23dissolution of the Fox Hills Sanitary District.24    (c) The board of trustees of the of the Village of 25Lindenhurst may, by ordinance, terminate the terms of all 26members of the board of trustees of the Lindenhurst Sanitary   HB0663 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 04550 RTM 14577 b1District and the powers of the Lindenhurst Sanitary District 2shall be exercised by the board of trustees of the Village of 3Lindenhurst, including the District's authority to levy and 4collect taxes. 5    Once there are no debts of the Lindenhurst Sanitary 6District or the Village of Lindenhurst has sufficient funds on 7hand or available to satisfy any debts of the District, the 8board of trustees of the Village of Lindenhurst may dissolve 9the Lindenhurst Sanitary District and acquire all of the 10District's assets and responsibilities if it adopts an 11ordinance stating: (1) the reasons for dissolving the 12District; (2) that there are no outstanding debts of the 13District or that the Village has sufficient funds on hand or 14available to satisfy the debts; (3) that no federal or State 15permit or grant will be impaired by dissolution of the 16District; and (4) that the Village assumes all assets and 17responsibilities of the District. Upon dissolution of the 18District, the statutory powers of the former District shall be 19exercised by the board of trustees of the Village of 20Lindenhurst. No later than 60 days after the effective date of 21the ordinance, the Village of Lindenhurst shall notify the 22Illinois Environmental Protection Agency regarding the 23dissolution of the District. 24    (d) The Southeast Joliet Sanitary District may be 25dissolved and transfer its assets, liabilities, and 26responsibilities to the City of Joliet and, if necessary, the   HB0663 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 04550 RTM 14577 b1County of Will, if: (1) the board of the District adopts a 2resolution dissolving the District; and (2) the city council 3of the City of Joliet adopts a resolution, within 14 days after 4the District's resolution accepting the transfer. The 5dissolution and transfer shall not be effective until the 6resolutions described in this subsection (d) have been adopted 7by the District and the City. Each resolution must state: (1) 8the reasons for dissolving the District; (2) that there are no 9outstanding debts of the District or that the City of Joliet 10has sufficient funds on hand or available to satisfy the debts 11of the District; (3) that no federal or State permit or grant 12will be impaired by the dissolution of the District; and (4) 13that the City of Joliet assumes all assets and 14responsibilities of the District, except for those assets the 15City of Joliet deems to be unnecessary for continued operation 16of the District's facilities. The County of Will shall take 17responsibility for and control over assets deemed unnecessary 18by the City of Joliet. Upon dissolution, the statutory powers 19previously held by the District shall be held and exercised by 20the City of Joliet. No later than 60 days after the effective 21date of the City of Joliet's resolution, the City of Joliet 22shall notify the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency 23regarding the dissolution of the Southeast Joliet Sanitary 24District. 25(Source: P.A. 100-201, eff. 8-18-17; 100-874, eff. 1-1-19; 26101-111, eff. 7-19-19.)